North Carolina, session 2025, HB686.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Subdivision (14b) of G.S. 106-121 is recodified as subdivision (14c)
of that section.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 106-121, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 106-121. Definitions and general consideration.
For the purpose of this Article:
…
(4b) The term "cosmetic product" means a cosmetic for retail sale or professional
use.
…
(9a) The term "intentionally added chemical" means a chemical added during the
manufacturing of a product or product component to provide a specific
characteristic, appearance, or quality or to perform a specific function.
…
(11b) The term "manufacturer" means a person that manufactures a final consumer
product or whose brand name is affixed to the consumer product. In the case
of a consumer product that is imported into the United States, "manufacturer"
includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the consumer product if
the person that manufactured or assembled the consumer product or whose
brand name is affixed to the consumer product does not have a presence in the
United States.
…
(12b) The term "nonfunctional by-product" means an element or compound that has
no functional or technical effect in the finished product and that:
a. Was intentionally added during the manufacturing process for a
cosmetic product at any point in the supply chain for a product, a raw
material, or an ingredient; or
*H686-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Was created or formed during the manufacturing process at any point
in the supply chain for a product, a raw material, or an ingredient.
"Nonfunctional by-product" includes, but is not limited to, an unreacted raw
material, a breakdown product of an intentionally added chemical, or a
by-product of the manufacturing process.
(12c) The term "nonfunctional contaminant" means an element or compound
present in a cosmetic product as an unintentional consequence of
manufacturing that has no functional or technical effect in the finished
product. "Nonfunctional contaminant" includes, but is not limited to, elements
or compounds present in the environment as contaminants that were
introduced into a product, a raw material, or a product ingredient as a result of
the use of an environmental medium, such as a naturally occurring mineral,
air, soil, or water, in the manufacturing process at any point in the supply chain
for a product's, a raw material's, or an ingredient's supply chain.
…
(14b) The term "practical quantification limit" means the lowest concentration of a
chemical that can be reliably measured within specified limits of precision,
accuracy, representativeness, completeness, and comparability during routine
laboratory operating conditions.
…
(14g) The term "restricted substance" means any of the following:
a. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), including any
member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at
least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.
b. Heavy metals and heavy metal-containing compounds, including
arsenic, cadmium, cadmium compounds, chromium, lead, lead
compounds, nickel, and selenium.
c. Parabens, including butylparaben, ethylparaben, isobutylparaben,
isopropylparaben, methylparaben, and propylparaben.
d. Ortho-phthalates and their esters, including dibutyl phthalate,
dicyclohexyl phthalate, hexyl phthalate, diisobutyl phthalate,
diisodecyl phthalate, diisononyl phthalate, diisooctyl phthalate,
diethylhexyl phthalate, diethyl phthalate, and benzyl butyl phthalate.
e. Formaldehyde and formaldehyde releasers, including formaldehyde,
paraformaldehyde, quaternium-15, diazolidinyl urea, DMDM
hydantoin, methylene glycol, imidazolidinyl urea, and sodium
hydroxymethylglycinate.
f. Benzophenones, including benzophenone, benzophenone-1,
benzophenone-2, benzophenone-3, dihydroxybenzophenone,
resbenzophenone, and oxybenzone.
g. Known carcinogens, including benzene, carbon black, coal tar,
ethylene oxide, toluene, naphthalene, metallic nickel, styrene, and
xylene.
h. Asbestos and asbestos-containing compounds, including talc.
i. Butylated compounds, including butylated hydroxytoluene and
butylated hydroxyanisole.
j. Siloxanes, including cyclotetrasiloxane, cyclopentasiloxane,
octamethylcyclotetrasiloxane, and cyclosiloxanes.
k. Phenylenediamines, including m-phenylenediamine,
o-phenylenediamine, and p-phenylenediamine; triclosan; triclocarban;
and nonylphenol.
Page 2 House Bill 686-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
l. Nitrosamine and nitrosamine releasers, including diethanolamine and
triethanolamine.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 106-132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-132. Additives, etc., deemed unsafe.
Any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, any food additive, any pesticide
chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity or any color additive, shall with respect to any
particular use or intended use be deemed unsafe for the purpose of application of
G.S. 106-129(1), paragraphs b and g and 106-129(4) with respect to any food, 106-133(1) with
respect to any drug or device, or 106-136(1) and (5) 106-136(1), (5), and (6) with respect to any
cosmetic, unless there is in effect a regulation pursuant to G.S. 106-139 of this Article limiting
the quantity of substance, and the use or intended use of such substance conforms to the terms
prescribed by such regulation. While such regulations relating to such substance are in effect, a
food, drug, or cosmetic shall not, by reason of bearing or containing such substance in accordance
with the regulations be considered adulterated within the meaning of G.S. 106-129(1)a,
106-133(1) and 106-136(1)."
SECTION 3. G.S. 106-136 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-136. Cosmetics deemed adulterated.
A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated:
…
(6) If it contains a restricted substance as an intentionally added chemical in any
amount, including as a nonfunctional by-product or a nonfunctional
contaminant above the practical quantification limit. The practical
quantification limit must be based on scientifically defensible, standard
analytical methods. The practical quantification limit for a given restricted
substance may be different depending on the analytical method used."
SECTION 4. Article 12 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 106-141.2. Certificate of compliance for cosmetic products.
(a) If the Board of Agriculture has reason to believe that a cosmetic product contains a
restricted substance as an intentionally added chemical and is being offered for sale in violation
of this article, the Board may issue a notice to the manufacturer of the cosmetic product to provide
the Board with a certificate of compliance attesting that the cosmetic product does not contain a
restricted substance as an intentionally added chemical no later than 30 days after the date of the
notice.
(b) A manufacturer that does not provide a certificate of compliance shall notify persons
that sell that cosmetic product in this State that the sale of that cosmetic product is prohibited in
this State and provide the Board of Agriculture with a list of the names and addresses of those
notified no later than 30 days after the date of the notice."
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
House Bill 686-First Edition Page 3